District of Columbia statutes.
29-312.40

Deposit with Mayor.

Assets of a dissolved corporation that should be transferred to a creditor, claimant, or shareholder of the corporation who cannot be found or who is not competent to receive them shall be reduced to cash and deposited with the Mayor for safekeeping. When the creditor, claimant, or shareholder furnishes satisfactory proof of entitlement to the amount deposited, the Mayor shall pay the person or the person’s representative that amount.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720